Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4873.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1147a. Beginning with the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, the legislature shall appropriate not less than $610,000,000.00 each fiscal year for great start readiness programs, as described in section 32d of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1632d.